Utah statutes.
63B-1-319.   Legal, accounting, and auditing services.

(1) The attorney general shall provide all legal services, and the state auditor shall provide all accounting and auditing services, required by the authority, without reimbursement from that authority.

(2)  Subsection (1) does not apply to attorneys' or accountants' opinions required for the issuance of any obligations.

(3)  The authority may:

(a)  obtain accounting and auditing services in addition to those specified in Subsections (1) and (2) from outside accountants and auditors, with the consent of the state auditor;

(b)  obtain legal services in addition to those specified in Subsections (1) and (2) from outside attorneys, with the consent of the attorney general; and

(c)  include the costs of these services:

(i)  in the rentals and charges payable to it under leases or agreements between it and state bodies for the use of space in facilities; or

(ii)  as a cost payable from the proceeds of the sale of obligations for which those services were provided.

